District of Columbia statutes.
31-3303.05

Coverage.

If coverage to the small or large employer market pursuant to this subchapter ceases to be written, administered, or otherwise provided, such coverage shall continue to be governed by this subchapter with respect to business conducted under this subchapter that was transacted prior to the effective date of termination and that remains in force.

History

Apr. 13, 1999, D.C. Law 12-209, § 305, 45 DCR 8433

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 35-1035.

Temporary Addition of Section

See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 31-3301.01.

Emergency Legislation

See notes to § 31-3301.01.